test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-mihkw_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Noun - mihkw - ok : # -m inanimate noun, blood, Wolvengrey
     mihko+N+IN+Sg: mihko
     mihko+N+IN+Sg+Px1Sg: nimihkom
     mihko+N+IN+Sg+Px2Sg: kimihkom
     mihko+N+IN+Sg+Px1Pl: nimihkominân
     mihko+N+IN+Sg+Px12Pl: kimihkominaw
     mihko+N+IN+Sg+Px2Pl: kimihkomiwâw
     mihko+N+IN+Sg+Px3Sg: omihkom
     mihko+N+IN+Sg+Px3Pl: omihkomiwâw
     mihko+N+IN+Sg+Px4Pl: omihkomiyiw
     
     mihko+N+IN+Loc: mihkohk
     mihko+N+IN+Px1Sg+Loc: nimihkomihk
     mihko+N+IN+Px2Sg+Loc: kimihkomihk
     mihko+N+IN+Px1Pl+Loc: nimihkominâhk
     mihko+N+IN+Px12Pl+Loc: kimihkominâhk
     mihko+N+IN+Px2Pl+Loc: kimihkomiwâhk
     mihko+N+IN+Px3Sg+Loc: omihkomihk
     mihko+N+IN+Px3Pl+Loc: omihkomiwâhk
     mihko+N+IN+Px4Pl+Loc: omihkomiyihk
     
     mihko+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Sg: mihkos
     mihko+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Loc: mihkosihk
     mihko+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Sg+Px1Sg: nimihkomis #? 
     mihko+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Sg+Px2Sg: kimihkomis #?
     mihko+N+IN+Der/Dim+N+IN+Sg+Px3Sg: omihkomis #?
